Tennessee, session 114, HB0112.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 8-30-102(b), is amended by inserting
the following new subdivisions:
(14) The Tennessee sports wagering council and its employees;
(15) Full-time board members of the board of parole; and
(16) Full-time board members of the inmate disciplinary oversight board.
SECTION 2. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 8-50-113, is amended by adding the
following as a new subsection (b) and redesignating the existing subsections accordingly:
(b) Notwithstanding subsection (a), bereavement leave granted in accordance
with subsection (a) for the officers and employees of the various agencies, boards, and
departments of state government identified in §§ 8-30-102(a), 8-30-102(b)(2)-(11), and
8-30-102(b)(13)-(16) must be granted without charge to the officers' or employees'
accumulated leave accounts as follows:
(1) Three (3) days paid leave in the event of death of such officers' or
employees' siblings, grandparents, grandchildren, foster parents, or parents-in-
law;
(2) Five (5) days paid leave in the event of death of such officers' or
employees' parents or stepparents; and
(3) Ten (10) days paid leave in the event of death of such officers' or
employees' spouse, children, or stepchildren.
HB0112
000807
- 1 -

SECTION 3. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
- 2 - 000807